Washington statutes.
RCW 33.40.080

Disposition of records.

Upon the termination of any liquidation proceeding, any files, records, documents, books of account, or other papers in the possession of the liquidator shall be surrendered into the possession of the director, who, in his or her discretion at any time after the expiration of one year, may destroy any of such files, records, documents, books of account or other papers which appear to him or her to be obsolete or unnecessary for future reference.

[ 1994 c 92 s 461; 1945 c 235 s 109; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-228.]